Nebraska, session 109, LB796.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB796 LB796
2026 2026
Section 1. Section 38-2850, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
38-2850 As authorized by the Uniform Credentialing Act, the practice
of pharmacy may be engaged in by a pharmacist, a pharmacist intern, or a
practitioner with a pharmacy license. The practice of pharmacy shall not
be construed to include any of the following:
(1) Practitioners, other than veterinarians, certified nurse
midwives, certified registered nurse anesthetists, nurse practitioners,
and physician assistants, who dispense drugs or devices as an incident to
the practice of their profession, except that if such practitioner
engages in dispensing such drugs or devices to his or her patients for
which such patients are charged, such practitioner shall obtain a
pharmacy license;
(2) Persons who sell, offer, or expose for sale nonprescription
drugs or proprietary medicines, the sale of which is not in itself a
violation of the Nebraska Liquor Control Act;
(3) Medical representatives, detail persons, or persons known by
some name of like import, but only to the extent of permitting the
relating of pharmaceutical information to health care professionals;
(4) Licensed veterinarians practicing within the scope of their
profession;
(5) Certified nurse midwives, certified registered nurse
anesthetists, nurse practitioners, and physician assistants who dispense
sample medications which are provided by the manufacturer and are
dispensed at no charge to the patient;
(6) Optometrists who prescribe or dispense eyeglasses or contact
lenses to their own patients, including contact lenses that contain and
deliver ocular pharmaceutical agents as authorized under the Optometry
Practice Act, and ophthalmologists who prescribe or dispense eyeglasses
or contact lenses to their own patients, including contact lenses that
contain and deliver ocular pharmaceutical agents;
-2-

LB796 LB796
2026 2026
(7) Registered nurses or licensed practical nurses employed by a
hospital who administer pursuant to a chart order, or procure for such
purpose, single doses of drugs or devices from original drug or device
containers or properly labeled repackaged or prepackaged drug or device
containers to persons registered as patients and within the confines of
the hospital;
(8) Persons employed by a facility where dispensed drugs and devices
are delivered from a pharmacy for pickup by a patient or caregiver and no
dispensing or storage of drugs or devices occurs;
(9) Persons who sell or purchase medical products, compounds,
vaccines, or serums used in the prevention or cure of animal diseases and
maintenance of animal health if such medical products, compounds,
vaccines, or serums are not sold or purchased under a direct, specific,
written medical order of a licensed veterinarian;
(10) A person accredited by an accrediting body who, pursuant to a
medical order, (a) administers, dispenses, or distributes medical gas or
medical gas devices to patients or ultimate users or (b) purchases or
receives medical gas or medical gas devices for administration,
dispensing, or distribution to patients or ultimate users; and
(11) A person accredited by an accrediting body who, pursuant to a
medical order, (a) sells, delivers, or distributes devices described in
subsection (2) of section 38-2841 to patients or ultimate users or (b)
purchases or receives such devices with intent to sell, deliver, or
distribute to patients or ultimate users.
Sec. 2. Original section 38-2850, Reissue Revised Statutes of
Nebraska, is repealed.
-3-